Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4824.
People of the State of Michigan enact: Sec. 105. (1) âAlcoholâ means the product of distillation of fermented liquid, whether or not rectified or diluted with water, but does not mean ethyl or industrial alcohol, diluted or not, that has been denatured or otherwise rendered unfit for beverage purposes. (2) âAlcohol vapor deviceâ means a device that provides for the use of air or oxygen bubbled through alcoholic liquor to produce a vapor or mist that allows the user to inhale this alcoholic vapor through the mouth or nose. (3) âAlcoholic liquorâ means any spirituous, vinous, malt, or fermented liquor, powder, liquids, and compounds, whether or not medicated, proprietary, or patented, and by whatever name called, containing 1/2 of 1% or more of alcohol by volume that are fit for use for food purposes or beverage purposes as defined and classified by the commission according to alcoholic content as belonging to 1 of the varieties defined in this chapter. (4) âAlternating proprietorshipâ means 1 of the following: (a) An arrangement in which 2 or more wine makers or small wine makers take turns using the same space and equipment to manufacture wine under section 603(9)(a) and in accordance with 27 CFR 24.136. (b) An arrangement in which 2 or more brewers or micro brewers take turns using the same space and equipment to manufacture beer under section 603(9)(b) and in accordance with 27 CFR 25.52. (c) An arrangement in which 2 or more distillers or small distillers take turns using the same space and equipment to manufacture spirits under section 603(9)(c) and in accordance with 27 CFR 19.141. (d) An arrangement in which 2 or more mixed spirit drink manufacturers take turns using the same space and equipment to manufacture mixed spirit drink under section 603(9)(d) and in accordance with 27 CFR 19.141. (5) âApproved tasting roomâ means a tasting room that is approved by the commission. A licensee with an approved tasting room is not a retail licensee as that term is used in this act and the rules promulgated under this act except for sections 701, 801, 803, 815, 905, and 906. (6) âAuthorized distribution agentâ means a person approved by the commission to do 1 or more of the following: (a) To store spirits owned by a supplier of spirits or the commission. (b) To deliver spirits sold by the commission to retail licensees. (c) To perform any function needed to store spirits owned by a supplier of spirits or by the commission or to deliver spirits sold by the commission to retail licensees. (7) âBarâ means a barrier or counter at which alcoholic liquor is sold to, served to, or consumed by customers. (8) âBeerâ means either of the following: (a) A beverage obtained by alcoholic fermentation of an infusion or decoction of barley, malt, hops, sugar, or other cereal in potable water that contains at least 0.5% of alcohol by volume. (b) A beverage obtained by alcoholic fermentation of an infusion or decoction of barley, malt, hops, or other cereal in potable water that contains less than 0.5% of alcohol by volume, including a beverage that contains 0.0% of alcohol by volume. (9) âBottleâ or âbottlingâ means a process, separate from manufacturing, using owned or leased equipment to fill and seal a container, including a keg, with alcoholic liquor for sale at wholesale or retail in accordance with this act. Bottle or bottling does not include filling a growler for sale at retail. (10) âBrandâ means any word, group of words, letter, group of letters, symbol, group of symbols, or combination of any word, name, group of letters, symbol, or trademark adopted and used by a supplier, to name, identify, or trademark a specific beer, malt beverage, wine, mixed wine drink, or mixed spirit drink product. A supplierâs legal name, assumed name, or trade name, or any doing-business-as name used by the supplier is considered a brand name, identifier, or trademark if it is used in a manner that is prominently featured on the container or packaging of the beer, wine, mixed wine drink, or mixed spirit drink to market the product and to identify the product, except under either of the following circumstances: (a) The use of the legal name, assumed name, trade name, or doing-business-as name is not considered a brand name, identifier, or trademark if it is not prominently featured on the container or packaging of the beer, wine, mixed wine drink, or mixed spirit drink. (b) The use of the legal name, assumed name, trade name, or doing-business-as name is not considered a brand name, identifier, or trademark if it is used solely for any of the following purposes: (i) Identifying the supplier that manufactured the beer, wine, mixed wine drink, or mixed spirit drink. (ii) Identifying the supplier that has bottled the beer, wine, mixed wine drink, or mixed spirit drink. (iii) Identifying the supplier that has imported the beer, wine, mixed wine drink, or mixed spirit drink. (11) âBrand extensionâ means any beer, wine, mixed wine drink, or mixed spirit drink brand that is marketed, in any manner, using the same name, identifier, or trademark associated with a brand that has preceded it in being sold or offered for sale in this state, or a derivative or portion of the name, identifier, or trademark, and that would lead a reasonable person to recognize its relationship to an existing brand, regardless of any of the following: (a) The addition of words or letters in a word. (b) The addition of a name, identifier, or trademark. (c) The addition of a symbol. (d) Any differences in the packaging, formulation, or production of the beer, wine, mixed wine drink, or mixed spirit drink or the shape, size, or type of container in which the beer, wine, mixed wine drink, or mixed spirit drink is sold. (e) Changes in the alcohol category used in the brand extension. As used in this subdivision only, âalcohol categoryâ means a beer category, a wine category, a mixed wine drink category, or a mixed spirit drink category. (f) The manufacturer, importer, or licensed outstate seller of the brand extension being different from the manufacturer, importer, or licensed outstate seller of the underlying brand the extension is based on. (12) âBrandyâ means an alcoholic liquor as defined in former 27 CFR 5.145. (13) âBrandy manufacturerâ means a wine maker or a small wine maker licensed under this act to manufacture brandy. A wine maker or small wine maker authorized to manufacture brandy shall not manufacture any other spirits. The commission may approve a brandy manufacturer to sell brandy that it manufactures at retail in accordance with section 537. (14) âBrewerâ means a person located in this state that is licensed to manufacture beer and sell at retail in accordance with section 537 and to licensed wholesalers beer manufactured by the person. (15) âBrewpubâ means a license issued in conjunction with a class C, tavern, class A hotel, or class B hotel license that authorizes the person licensed with the class C, tavern, class A hotel, or class B hotel license to manufacture and brew not more than 18,000 barrels of beer per calendar year in this state and sell at its licensed premises the beer produced for consumption on or off the licensed brewery premises in the manner provided for in sections 405, 407, and 537. (16) As used in subsection (10), âsupplierâ means a brewer, a micro brewer, an outstate seller of beer, a wine maker, a small wine maker, an outstate seller of wine, a manufacturer of a mixed wine drink, an outstate seller of a mixed wine drink, a mixed spirit drink manufacturer, and an outstate seller of a mixed spirit drink. (17) With regard to subsections (10) and (11), distribution rights in effect on December 23, 2025 are preserved. However, this subsection does not limit application of subsection (11) to a beer, wine, mixed wine drink, or mixed spirit drink that would be considered a brand extension after December 23, 2025 that is based on a brand that was in existence before December 23, 2025. Sec. 604. A supplier that registers a multibranded product with the commission shall appoint the wholesaler or wholesalers that have rights to the supplierâs underlying brand. As used in this section, âmultibranded productâ means any beer, wine, mixed wine drink, or mixed spirit drink that includes 2 or more brands of different suppliers. Sec. 1115. (1) A licensee that elects to sell spirits or mixed spirit drink between the hours of 12 noon on Sunday and 2 a.m. on Monday under section 1113 shall not do so until the licensee first obtains a permit and pays to the commission an additional fee in the amount of 15% of the fee charged for the issuance of the licenseeâs license. (2) The revenue received from subsection (1) for the sale of spirits or mixed spirit drink between 12 noon on Sunday and 2 a.m. on Monday must be deposited with the state treasurer in a special fund to be used only by the department of health and human services in programs for the treatment of alcoholics. Any other revenue resulting from the additional $160.00 license fee as described in section 1114 for sales of alcoholic liquor permitted under sections 1111 and 1113 must be deposited into the general fund. (3) In addition to any interest and earnings deposited under this subsection, $680,000.00 of the money in the special fund described in subsection (2) is transferred to and must be deposited into the general fund each fiscal year. (4) This section does not apply after September 30, 2029. This act is ordered to take immediate effect. Clerk of the House of Representatives Secretary of the Senate Approved___________________________________________ ____________________________________________________ Governor